Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202684-622
State Treasurer; duty to transfer funds.

The State Treasurer shall transfer:

(1) To the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund by October 1, 2024, and on or before June 30 of each year through June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services, (a) the first thirteen million dollars of any interest earned on or after July 1, 2024, and on or before June 30, 2026, on federal funds allocated to the State of Nebraska from the federal Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund pursuant to the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, 42 U.S.C. 802, as amended, (b) the first twelve million dollars of any interest earned on or after July 1, 2024, and on or before June 30, 2025, from the investment of money in the Perkins County Canal Project Fund pursuant to section 61-305, and (c) the first five million dollars of any interest earned on or after July 1, 2024, and on or before June 30, 2025, from the investment of money in the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund from transfers credited to such fund that are designated for the construction of a new state prison pursuant to section 72-1001; and

(2) To the Inland Port Authority Fund on or before June 30 of each year through June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services, (a) any interest earned after the first thirteen million dollars of interest earned on or after July 1, 2024, and on or before June 30, 2026, on federal funds allocated to the State of Nebraska from the federal Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund pursuant to the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, 42 U.S.C. 802, as amended, (b) any interest earned after the first nineteen million dollars of interest earned on or after July 1, 2024, and on or before June 30, 2025, from the investment of money in the Perkins County Canal Project Fund pursuant to section 61-305, and (c) any interest earned after the first five million dollars of interest earned on or after July 1, 2024, and on or before June 30, 2025, from the investment of money in the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund from transfers credited to such fund that are designated for the construction of a new state prison pursuant to section 72-1001.

Laws 2024, LB164, § 13;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 206.